Wisconsin, session 2025, SB466.
do enact as follows:SB466,13Section 1. 175.51 (1m) (a) 2. of the statutes is amended to read:SB466,2,51175.51 (1m) (a) 2. A person who has not attained the age of 18 years, whose 2location is unknown, and whose situation does not qualify for another alert and the 3person is believed to be incapable of returning home without assistance due to a 4physical or mental condition or disability or the person has not attained the age of 510 12 years.SB466,2,66